District of Columbia statutes.
42-1006

Giving of absolute power — To owner of unlimited estate.

Where a like power of disposition shall be given to any person to whom no particular estate is limited, such person shall also take a fee, subject to any future estates that may be limited thereon but absolute in respect to creditors and purchasers.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1353, ch. 854, § 1042
1981 Ed., § 45-106.
1973 Ed., § 45-1006.